Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4061.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 16, chapter 6, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 16-902, to read: START_STATUTE16-902. Candidates; clean elections funding NOTWITHSTANDING any other law, all candidates for statewide and legislative offices shall be participating CANDIDATES under the citizens clean elections act ESTABLISHED pursuant to article 2 of this chapter and are limited to accepting and spending campaign monies as prescribed by article 2 of this chapter.END_STATUTE